test/src/old-gt-norm-yamls/N-IN-maniway_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - maniway - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: naniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kaniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: waniway
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: waniwâyiw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: naniwânân
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kaniwânaw
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kaniwâwâw #?
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: waniwâwâw #?
     maniway+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: waniwâyiw
     
